apertium-niv.niv.lexd
# Multichar_Symbols

# ! Part of speech categories
# <n>   ! Noun
# <v>   ! Verb
# <adv> ! Adverb
# <cnjadv> ! Conjunctive adverb
# <prn> ! Pronoun
# <num> ! Numeral
# !<enc> ! Enclitic
# <det> ! Determiner
# <part> ! Particle
# <ij> ! Interjection

# ! Case categories
# <nom> ! Nominative
# <age> ! Agentive
# <dat> ! Dative
# <ins> ! Instrumental
# <loc> ! Locative
# <abl> ! Ablative
# <term> ! Terminative
# <comp> ! Comparative
# <voc> ! Vocative

# ! Pronoun categories
# <pers> ! Personal
# <dem> ! Demonstrative
# <indef> ! Indefinite
# <itg> ! Interrogative
# <ref> ! Reflexive

# ! Person categories
# <p1> ! First person
# <p2> ! Second person
# <p3> ! Third person

# ! Number categories
# <sg> ! Singular
# <du> ! Dual
# <pl> ! Plural

# ! Clusivity categories
# <incl> ! Inclusive
# <excl> ! Exclusive

# ! Verb categories
# <tv> ! Transitive verb
# <iv> ! Intransitive verb

# ! Verb forms
# <inf> ! infinitive
# <cvb_nar1> ! narrative converb (null suffix)
# <cvb_nar2> ! narrative converb (-data/-durngu)
# <cvb_ant> ! anterior/simultaneous converb
# <cvb_cond> ! conditional converb ("if")
# <nmz_pred> ! Predicate-actant nominalisation
# <nmz_subj> ! Subject nominalisation
# <nmz_loc> ! Locative nominalisation
# <nmz_adv> ! Adverbial nominalisation
# <perm> ! permanent property (for certain attributive verbs)

# ! Mood categories (for now)
# <ind> ! Indicative
# <pot> ! Potential
# ! <imp> ! Imperative
# <itg> ! Interrogative
# <itg_pej> ! pejorative interrogative

# ! Evidentiality / stuff
# ! may matter later

# ! Tense categories
# <fut> ! Future

# ! Noun categories
# <np> Proper noun

# ! Numeral classes
# <cl1>
# <cl2>
# <cl3>
# <cl4>
# <cl5>
# <cl6>
# <cl7>
# <cl8>
# <cl9>

# ! Formality categories
# <frm> ! Formal
# <infrm> ! Informal

# ! Noun Attribute
# <attr> ! Noun attribute

# ! Other symbols
# ! <redup> ! Reduplication
# <qst>
# <foc>
# <emph>
# <poss>
# >      ! Morpheme boundary
# {х}     ! Cyrillic
# {I}     ! in some numeral
# !%ʼ
# {ʼ}
# {и}

# {д}     ! undergo voicing
# {ф}

# {a}     ! delete sometimes
# {o}
# {u}
# {y}
# {j}
# {f}
# {ь}

# {T}     ! (Latin)
# {X}     ! (Latin)
# {V}
# {Q}
# {R}
# {B}
# {G}
# {Г}
# {v}
# {n}

# ! Punctuation tags
# <sent>      ! Sentence marker
# <guio>      ! Hyphen
# <cm>        ! Comma
# <apos>      ! Apostrophe
# <rquot>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
# <lquot>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
# <rpar>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
# <lpar>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

# %[Verb%]      ! verb for twoc
# %[Noun%]      ! noun for twoc



#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot
умгу:умгу           # woman
ытык:ытык           # father
ӄан:ӄан             # doggo
ӈа:ӈа               # animal
тыф:ты{ф}           # house
ми:ми               # inside
нивх:нив{х}         # person, man
ваӄа:ваӄа           # box
сета:сета           # sugar
ойдам:ойдам         # baby
курӈ:курӈ           # universe
тяӄо:ч{ь}аӄо        # knife
оола:оола           # child
чʼатьф:чʼ{ь}ать{ф}  # bog, swamp
ыф:ы{ф}             # beard
арф:ар{ф}           # side of boat
ӿуньф:ӿунь{ф}       # barrel
пердь:пердь         # burden
ыкын:ыкын           # older brother
атик:атик           # younger brother
нанак:нанак         # older sister
ытик:ытик           # grandmother
пос:пос             # fabric, cloth
ӈафӄ:ӈафӄ           # friend
леп:леп             # bread
ларӄ:ларӄ           # shirt
кинс:кинс           # devil
во:во               # village
кʼеӄ:к{ʼ}еӄ         # fox
чеврӄ:ч{ь}еврӄ      # bird
тупр̌:тупр̌           # feather
тюс:тюс             # meat
мулк:мулк           # basket
ӈояӄ:ӈояӄ           # egg
ӄʼас:ӄ{ʼ}ас         # tambourine
выйбукс:выйбукс     # tie
мифпʼидь:мифпʼидь   # toad
ӄʼос:ӄ{ʼ}ос         # neck
олғоӈ:олғоӈ         # pig, hog, swine
коӽ:коӽ             # belly
пыньх:пыньх         # soup
нё:нё               # barn
ӿеӄрӈа:ӿеӄрӈа       # place further from shore (than here)
лумр:лумр           # sable
ӿонтӄ:ӿонтӄ         # sack
ӿемар:ӿемар         # old man
паӽ:паӽ             # stone, rock
толф:тол{ф}         # summer
ма:ма               # dried fish
питғы:питғы         # paper (written), book
пон:пон             # villager
кʼеӈ:к{ʼ}еӈ         # sun
ӈыньк:ӈыньк 	      # face
ӈайн:ӈайн 	        # cheek
т’ыр:т{’}ыр         # left (not right)
ӈир:ӈир 	          # right (not left)
ӈамадь:ӈамадь       # skin
няӽ:няӽ 	          # eye
них:них 	          # tear (from the eye)
т’адм:т{ʼ}адм 	    # pate, crown of head
т’а:т{ʼ}а 	        # pate, crown of head
ӿеғми:ӿеғми 	      # temple (of head)
нос:нос 	          # ear
мла:мла 	          # earlobe
вих:вих 	          # nose
ньхыр:ньхыр 	      # eyebrow
ыӈг:ыӈг 	          # mouth
ӈығс:ӈығс 	        # tooth
эмс:эмс 	          # molar
ӈыньф:ӈынь{ф} 	    # bone
ывлх:ывлх 	        # lip
ити:ити 	          # chin
оӻри:оӻри 	        # nape, occiput
тʼуур:т{ʼ}уур       # fire
кʼуты:к{ʼ}уты       # hole
керӄ:керӄ           # sea
пʼирӈыр:п{ʼ}ирӈыр   # sazan (kind of carp)
теӈи:теӈи           # salmon
ыс:ыс               # owner
лаӈр:лаӈр           # seal
ӿыйк:ӿыйк           # hare
пых:пых             # cuckoo
топин:топин         # jay
тʼом:т{ʼ}ом         # fat
мур:мур             # horse
чо:чо               # fish
чӽа:чӽа             # money
кʼнык:кʼнык         # promontory
ымык:ымык           # mother
ӄʼах:ӄ{ʼ}ах         # spear
ӄʼотр:ӄ{ʼ}отр       # bear
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
        #!!! New words !!!
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
тавӻай:тавӻай       # crab
вынь:вынь           # kettle
туӈ:туӈ             # sea lion
тойғур:тойғур       # seal
чуғнык:чуғнык       # walrus
ыс:ыс               # swallow (bird)
ат:ат               # tiger
кетул:кетул         # giraffe
кʼузр:к{ʼ}узр       # wolverine
лаӄр:лаӄр           # squirrel
воӈи:воӈи           # musk deer
меӄ:меӄ             # musk deer
лиғс:лиғс           # wolf
лиғзнонӄ:лиғзнонӄ   # wolf cub
мем:мем             # monkey
обезьяна:обезьяна   # monkey
мок:мок             # bear
чхыф:чхы{ф}         # bear
тотр:тотр           # marten
тʼоӽ:т{ʼ}оӽ         # moose
торӄ:торӄ           # badger
члығи:члығи         # lynx
ӈы:ӈы               # otter
чоӽ:чоӽ             # fang, tusk
нитьф:нить{ф}       # target
ӈаӻр:ӈаӻр           # skin, coat, pelt
тиф:ти{ф}           # track, print, footprint
авсӄ:авсӄ           # ruff, ruffe (fish)
ва:ва               # predatory carp; redfin culter; Chanodichthys erythropterus
вағс:вағс           # whitefish
тёмр:тёмр           # grass; leaf
визлых:визлых       # root
титӈыр:титӈыр       # thorn
р̌авӈыкс:р̌{ʼ}авӈыкс  # rhododendron
кʼмый:к{ʼ}мый       # oak
ӿим:ӿим             # Siberian dwarf pine
ӈарӈи:ӈарӈи         # fir
тэуӈи:тэуӈи         # maple (tree)
тэвӻай:тэвӻай       # maple (tree)
ӿивс:ӿивс           # birch
мускыр:мускыр       # poplar
каӻӈ:каӻӈ           # pine
олӽ:олӽ             # cane, rush, reed
музӈи:музӈи         # sedge
воӻдёӈр:воӻдёӈр     # hummock, hillock, mound
мер:мер             # pussy willow
оӻм:оӻм             # bark
вах:вах             # moss
аньӽ:аньӽ           # female
ар:ар               # male
ӈайк:ӈайк           # puppy
найӄнонӄ:найӄнонӄ   # puppy
кʼыск:к{ʼ}ыск       # cat (female)
архыск:архыск       # cat (male)
олоӈ:олоӈ           # pig, hog, swine
арэӻа:арэӻа         # bull, ox
мур:мур             # horse
армур:армур         # stallion
чӈыр:чӈыр           # hay
мус:мус             # oats
ӄʼорӽ:ӄ{ʼ}орӽ       # blockhead, dimwit, dunce
чылғи:чылғи         # foot
ынғи:ынғи           # heel
пих:пих             # knee
ӈаф:ӈа{ф}           # thigh
ӈиф:ӈи{ф}           # heart
хых:хых             # calf (of leg)
кезӈи:кезӈи         # gland
микрвыкрук:микрвыкрук  # kidneys
ӈызрк:ӈызрк         # vein
ӈыньф:ӈынь{ф}       # bone
сусыр:сусыр         # spleen
тʼвирк:т{ʼ}вирк     # bile
чылу:чылу           # fog
лах:лах             # cloud
члы:члы             # sky
миф:ми{ф}           # earth
орми:орми           # clay
маӽ:маӽ             # sand
эри:эри             # river
пал:пал             # mountain
пал:пал             # taiga
пот:пот             # knoll, hill, mound
ӈыю:ӈыю             # ravine
ӈалу:ӈалу           # bay
ки:ки               # footwear
ӄʼоӻа:ӄ{ʼ}оӻа       # nature
утку:утку           # husband

LEXICON CASES
<nom>:>              # Nominative
<age>:>{a}ӽ          # Agentive
<dat>:>{R}{o}ӽ       # Dative
<ins>:>{G}ир         # Instrumental
<loc>:>{u}{j}н       # Locative
<abl>:>{u}х          # Ablative
<term>:>{T}{ʼ}ыкы    # Terminative
<term>:>{T}{ʼ}{X}а   # Dir/LR
<term>:>{R}оӻо       # Dir/LR
<comp>:>{y}к         # Comparative
<voc>:>{V}           # Vocative
# INCORPORATE-N ;    # Nominative

LEXICON CLITICS
<qst>:>ла            # Y/N questions
<emph>:>{R}и         # intensifying particle 'even'
<emph>:>ӿагин        # intensifying particle 'even'
<foc>:>{R}а          # focus particle
<foc>:>ат            # focus particle
<part>:>ӿайра        # 'probably'
<itg_pej>:>ӿата      # used with an interrogative word, expresses displeasure/disapproval

LEXICON POSSESSION
<poss_1sg>:нь>     # 1sg

PATTERNS
NounRoot
NounRoot CASES
NounRoot TVerbRoot    # Incorporation
POSSESSION NounRoot

LEXICON ProperNounRoot
Рум:Рум             # dude called Rum
Иисус:Иисус         # Jesus

LEXICON PronounRoot
PersPronRoot
IndefPronRoot
DemPronRoot
IntPronRoot

LEXICON PersPronRoot
ни:н             # I
чи:ч             # you
иф:{и}{f}        # he, she, it
ньыӈ:ньыӈ        # they and I
мер:мер          # y'all and I
меги:меги        # you and I
чыӈ:чыӈ          # y'all
имӈ:имӈ          # they
пʼи:пʼ           # oneself

LEXICON IndefPronRoot
ӿуӈрыдь:ӿуӈрыдь  # something like this

LEXICON DemPronRoot
тыдь:тыдь        # this (one)
ӿыдь:ӿыдь        # that (one)
адь:адь          # that (one)

LEXICON IntPronRoot
аӈ:аӈ            # who

LEXICON DeterminerRoot
ӿы:ӿы            # that
ты:ты            # this

LEXICON NumeralRoot

нин:н            # one
мен:м            # two

LEXICON VerbRoot
TVerbRoot
IVerbRoot
IVerb-AdvRoot
IrregFreeVerbRoot

LEXICON TVerbRoot
за:з{ь}а         # to beat, strike
во:во            # to take
даю:даю          # to write
ғе:ғе            # to buy, take
ӄала:ӄала        # to hate
ама:ама          # to look at
иғ:иғ            # to kill
ху:х{ʼ}у         # to kill
ӽа:ӽ{ʼ}а         # to shoot
фыврк:ф{ʼ}ыврк   # to pluck
р̌а:р{ʼ}а         # to fry
фын:ф{ʼ}ын       # to throw
хир:х{ʼ}ир       # to use
ыӈг:ыӈг          # to rip up
мот:мот          # to kiss
ар:ар            # to feed
ӽат:ӽ{ʼ}ат       # to scold
амӽта:амӽта      # to praise
ыз:ыз            # to call
ор:ор            # to meet
ӈарма:ӈарма      # to wait for, await
ӽони:ӽ{ʼ}они     # to save, rescue
ньр̌ы:ньр̌ы        # to see
р̌ык:р̌{ʼ}ык       # to bring home
имы:имы          # to give
лызи:лызи        # to pass, go past
рғоп:рғоп        # to touch
р̌ыпр:р̌{ʼ}ыпр     # to bring
эзму:эзму        # to love
уски:уски        # to pay for
эски:эски        # to sell
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
        #!!! New words !!!
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
ӿеть:ӿеть         # to take out (of)
нот:нот           # to feed
кʼрығры:к{ʼ}рығры # to serve, attend to, wait on
леулеу:леулеу     # to avoid
ле:ле             # to get used to, become accustomed to
ӈарӈар:ӈарӈар     # to threaten
ағағ:ағағ         # to disturb
хна:х{ʼ}на        # to grease
куз:куз           # to take out
зу:з{ь}у          # to wash
